Florida, session 2026, HB1267.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 414.095, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
414.095 Determining eligibility for temporary cash
assistance.—
(1) ELIGIBILITY.—An applicant must meet the eligibility
requirements of this section before receiving services or
temporary cash assistance under this chapter, except that an
applicant is shall be required to register for work and engage
in work activities in accordance with s. 445.024, as designated
by the local workforce development board, and may receive
support services or child care assistance in conjunction with
such requirement. The department shall make a determination of
eligibility based on the criteria listed in this chapter. The
department shall monitor continued eligibility for temporary
cash assistance through periodic reviews consistent with the
food assistance eligibility process. Benefits may not be denied
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1267-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 1267 2026
to an individual solely based on a felony drug conviction,
unless the conviction is for trafficking pursuant to s. 893.135.
An individual may not be denied benefits solely on the basis of
a drug trafficking conviction pursuant to s. 893.135 if the
department determines that the individual was a victim of human
trafficking, as defined in s. 943.0583(1), at the time of the
offense leading to such conviction. To be eligible under this
section, an individual convicted of a drug felony must be
satisfactorily meeting the requirements of the temporary cash
assistance program, including all substance abuse treatment
requirements. Within the limits specified in this chapter, the
state opts out of the provision of Pub. L. No. 104-193, s. 115,
that eliminates eligibility for temporary cash assistance and
food assistance for any individual convicted of a controlled
substance felony.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1267-01-c1